Utah statutes.
54-8a-10.   Installation of nonmetallic facilities.

Any operator installing a nonmetallic facility, such as a sewer, water, or fiber optic line, shall install the nonmetallic facility so that it can be located with standard underground facility detection devices or in a concrete conduit system.



Amended by Chapter 344, 2008 General Session

